Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB597.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Same-Day Work and Pay Pilot Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Conservation and Natural Resources of the Commonwealth."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town, township or home rule municipality."Program." The Same-Day Work and Pay Pilot Program 123456789101112131415161718 established under section 3.Section 3. Purpose of program establishment.The department shall establish the Same-Day Work and Pay Pilot Program to assess the feasibility of implementing a Statewide same-day work and pay program for municipalities to assist underemployed and unemployed individuals.Section 4. Program.(a) Requirement.--A municipality that participates in the program shall employ underemployed and unemployed individuals to perform daily work on assignments, including, but not limited to:(1) rehabilitation and repair of community parks and recreation facilities;(2) community conservation and beautification projects; and(3) other community improvement projects.(b) Compensation and payment.--An individual employed under the program shall receive a set compensation amount per day based on a set number of hours worked as determined by the department. An individual shall be paid at the completion of the workday.Section 5. Program operation.The program shall operate for a period of one year beginning no later than one year after the effective date of this section. Upon expiration of the one-year period, the department shall transmit a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The program shall cease operations upon the publication of the notice in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 6. Duties of department.20250HB0597PN0605 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Guidelines and procedures.--Before the program begins, the department shall establish guidelines and procedures for the program, including the following:(1) Eligibility criteria to participate in the program.(2) A uniform procedure to report data and information about the operation of the program to the department.(b) Evaluation.--No later than six months after the program ceases operations, the department shall issue an evaluation of the program and transmit notice of the evaluation to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and post the evaluation on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 7. Same-Day Work and Pay Account.The General Assembly shall appropriate money to implement this act.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0597PN0605 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718